dictsource/aol_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Alorese

.replace
       ʼ       '     // replace modified apostrophe to simple apostrophe

.group a
        a         a

.group e
        e         E
		
.group i
        i         i
		
.group o
        o         O
		
.group u
        u         u
		
.group b
        b         b
		
.group d
        d         d
		
.group f
        f         f
		
.group g
        g         g
		
.group h
        h         h
		
.group j
        j         dZ
		
.group k
        k         k
		
.group l
        l         l
		
.group m
        m         m
		
.group n
        n         n
	ng       N
	
.group o
        o         o
		
.group p
        p         p
		
.group r
        r         r
		
.group s
        s         s
		
.group t
        t         t
		
.group w
        w         w
		
.group y
        y         j

.group '
        '         ?
		
